Maryland, session 2026, HB0246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–927.
(a) (1) When registered with the Administration, every trailer and semitrailer
is a Class G (trailer) vehicle.
21–1414.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Authority” means the Maryland Transportation Authority
(3) “Electronic toll collection” means a system in a toll collection facility
that is capable of collecting information from a motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER)
VEHICLE for use in charging tolls.
– 1 –

Ch. 482 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) “Notice of toll due” or “notice” means an administrative notice of a video
toll transaction.
(5) “Person alleged to be liable” means:
(i) The registered owner of a motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER)
VEHICLE involved in a video toll transaction; or
(ii) A person to whom a registered owner of a motor vehicle OR
CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE has transferred liability for a video toll transaction in
accordance with this section and the regulations of the Authority.
(6) “Recorded image” means an image of a motor vehicle OR CLASS G
(TRAILER) VEHICLE passing through a toll collection facility recorded by a video
monitoring system:
(i) On:
1. One or more photographs, micrographs, or electronic
images;
2. Videotape; or
3. Any other medium; and
(ii) Showing either the front or rear of the motor vehicle OR CLASS
G (TRAILER) VEHICLE on at least one image or portion of tape and clearly identifying the
[license] REGISTRATION plate number and state of the motor vehicle OR CLASS G
(TRAILER) VEHICLE.
(7) “Registered owner” means, with respect to a motor vehicle OR CLASS
G (TRAILER) VEHICLE, the person or persons designated as the registered owner in the
records of the government agency that is responsible for motor vehicle OR CLASS G
(TRAILER) VEHICLE registration.
(8) “Toll collection facility” means any point on an Authority highway
where a toll is incurred and is required to be paid.
(9) “Toll violation” means the failure to pay a video toll within the time
prescribed by the Authority in a notice of toll due.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 482
(10) “Video monitoring system” means a device installed to work in
conjunction with a toll collection facility that produces a recorded image when a video toll
transaction occurs.
(11) “Video toll” means the amount assessed by the Authority when a video
toll transaction occurs.
(12) “Video toll transaction” means any transaction in which a motor vehicle
OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE does not or did not pay a toll at the time of passage
through a toll collection facility with a video monitoring system.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, the registered owner
of a motor vehicle OR, IF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE CANNOT
BE DETERMINED, CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE shall be liable to the Authority for
payment of a video toll as provided for in the regulations of the Authority.
(2) The Authority shall send the registered owner of a motor vehicle OR
CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE that has incurred a video toll a notice of toll due.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, the person alleged
to be liable who receives a notice of toll due shall have at least 30 days to pay the video toll.
(4) To mail the notice of toll due, the Authority shall use:
(i) The current mailing address on file with the Administration; or
(ii) If a mailing address is unavailable, the current residential
address on file with the Administration.
(c) (1) Failure of the person alleged to be liable to pay the video toll under a
notice of toll due by the date stated on the notice shall constitute a toll violation subject to
a civil citation and a civil penalty, which shall be assessed 15 days after the toll violation
occurs, as provided for in the regulations of the Authority.
(2) A registered owner of a motor vehicle [shall] OR CLASS G (TRAILER)
VEHICLE MAY not be liable for a civil penalty imposed under this section if the operator of
the motor vehicle OR MOTOR VEHICLE TOWING THE CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE has
been convicted of failure or refusal to pay a toll under § 21–1413 of this subtitle for the
same violation.
(d) (1) (i) The Authority or its duly authorized agent shall send a citation
via first–class mail, no later than 60 days after the toll violation, to the person alleged to
be liable under this section.
– 3 –

Ch. 482 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) To mail the citation, the Authority or its duly authorized agent
shall use:
1. The current mailing address on file with the
Administration; or
2. If a mailing address is unavailable, the current residential
address on file with the Administration.
(2) Personal service of the citation on the person alleged to be liable shall
not be required, and a record of mailing kept in the ordinary course of business shall be
admissible evidence of the mailing of the notice of toll due and citation.
(3) A citation shall contain:
(i) The name and address of the person alleged to be liable under
this section;
(ii) The [license] REGISTRATION plate number and state of
registration of the motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE involved in the video
toll transaction;
(iii) The location where the video toll transaction took place;
(iv) The date and time of the video toll transaction;
(v) The amount of the video toll and the date it was due as stated on
the notice of toll due;
(vi) A copy of the recorded image;
(vii) A statement that the video toll was not paid before the civil
penalty was assessed;
(viii) The amount of the civil penalty; and
(ix) The date by which the video toll and civil penalty must be paid.
(4) A citation shall also include:
(i) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section of the manner and the time in which liability alleged in the citation may be
contested;
(ii) The statutory defenses described in subsection (g) of this section
that were originally included in the notice of toll due; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 482
(iii) A warning that failure to pay the video toll and civil penalty, to
contest liability in the manner and time prescribed, or to appear at a trial requested is an
admission of liability and a waiver of available defenses and may result in the refusal or
suspension of the motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE registration and
referral for collection.
(5) A person alleged to be liable receiving the citation for a toll violation
under this section may:
(i) Pay the video toll and the civil penalty directly to the Authority;
(ii) Request to pay the video toll and civil penalty through the
installment plan under § 21–1417 of this subtitle; or
(iii) Elect to stand trial for the alleged violation.
(6) (i) If the person alleged to be liable under this section fails to elect
to stand trial or to appear at trial after having elected to stand trial, fails to pay the
prescribed video toll and civil penalty within 30 days after mailing of the citation or in
accordance with an installment payment plan approved by the Authority, or is adjudicated
to be liable after trial, the Authority or its duly authorized agent may:
1. Collect the video toll and the civil penalty by any means of
collection as provided by law; and
2. Notify the Administration of the failure to pay the video
toll and civil penalty in accordance with subsection (i) of this section.
(ii) No additional hearing or proceeding is required before the
Administration takes action with respect to the motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER)
VEHICLE of the registered owner under subsection (i) of this section.
(e) (1) A certificate alleging that a toll violation occurred and that the video
toll payment was not received before the civil penalty was assessed, sworn to or affirmed
by a duly authorized agent of the Authority, based upon inspection of a recorded image and
electronic toll collection records produced by an electronic toll collection video monitoring
system shall be evidence of the facts contained therein and shall be admissible in any
proceeding alleging a violation under this section without the presence or testimony of the
duly authorized agent who performed the requirements under this section.
(2) The citation, including the certificate, shall constitute prima facie
evidence of liability for the toll violation and civil penalty.
(f) Adjudication of liability under this section:
– 5 –

Ch. 482 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) Shall be based upon a preponderance of evidence;
(2) May not be deemed a conviction of a registered owner of a motor vehicle
OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE under the [Motor Vehicle Code] MARYLAND VEHICLE
LAW;
(3) May not be made part of the registered owner’s motor vehicle operating
record; and
(4) May not be considered in the provision of motor vehicle insurance
coverage.
(g) (1) If, at the time of a video toll transaction, a motor vehicle OR CLASS G
(TRAILER) VEHICLE is operated by a person other than the registered owner without the
express or implied consent of the registered owner, and if the registered owner by the date
stated on the notice of toll due provides the Authority or its duly authorized agent with a
notarized admission by the person accepting liability which shall include that person’s
name, address, and driver’s license identification number, then the person accepting
liability shall be liable under this section and shall be sent a notice of toll due.
(2) If the registered owner is a lessor of motor vehicles OR CLASS G
(TRAILER) VEHICLES, and at the time of the video toll transaction the motor vehicle OR
CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE involved was in the possession of a lessee, and the lessor
by the date stated on the notice of toll due provides the Authority or its duly authorized
agent with a copy of the lease agreement or other documentation acceptable to the
Authority identifying the lessee, including the person’s name, address, and driver’s license
identification number or federal employer identification number, then the lessee shall be
liable under this section and shall be sent a notice of toll due.
(3) If the motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE involved in a
video toll transaction is operated using a dealer or transporter registration plate, and at
the time of the video toll transaction the motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE
was under the custody and control of a person other than the owner of the dealer or
transporter registration plate, and if the owner of the dealer or transporter registration
plate by the date stated on the notice of toll due provides to the Authority or its duly
authorized agent a copy of the contractual agreement or other documentation acceptable to
the Authority identifying the person, including the person’s name, address, and driver’s
license identification number, who had custody and control over the motor vehicle OR
CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE at the time of the video toll transaction, then that person
and not the owner of the dealer or transporter registration plate shall be liable under this
section and shall be sent a notice of toll due.
(4) IF A CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE INVOLVED IN A VIDEO TOLL
TRANSACTION WAS BEING TOWED BY A MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIDEO
TOLL TRANSACTION, AND IF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF THE CLASS G (TRAILER)
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 482
VEHICLE BY THE DATE STATED ON THE NOTICE OF TOLL DUE PROVIDES TO THE
AUTHORITY OR ITS DULY AUTHORIZED AGENT A COPY OF THE CONTRACTUAL
AGREEMENT OR OTHER DOCUMENTATION ACCEPTABLE TO THE AUTHORITY
IDENTIFYING THE PERSON OPERATING THE TOW VEHICLE, INCLUDING THE
PERSON’S NAME, ADDRESS, AND DRIVER’S LICENSE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER, WHO
HAD CUSTODY AND CONTROL OVER THE CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE AT THE TIME
OF THE VIDEO TOLL TRANSACTION, THEN THAT PERSON AND NOT THE OWNER OF
THE CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE SHALL BE LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION AND
SHALL BE SENT A NOTICE OF TOLL DUE.
(5) If a motor vehicle, CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE, or registration plate
[number] OF A MOTOR VEHICLE OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE is reported to a law
enforcement agency as stolen at the time of the video toll transaction, and the registered
owner by the date stated on the notice of toll due provides to the Authority or its duly
authorized agent a copy of the police report substantiating that the motor vehicle, CLASS
G (TRAILER) VEHICLE, OR REGISTRATION PLATE OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR CLASS
G (TRAILER) VEHICLE was stolen at the time of the video toll transaction, then the
registered owner of the motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE is not liable under
this section.
(h) (1) The Authority may refer a delinquent account for unpaid video tolls and
associated civil penalties to the Central Collection Unit for collection.
(2) The Authority may recall a delinquent account from the Central
Collection Unit if:
(i) The delinquent account exceeds $300 in unpaid video tolls and
associated civil penalties;
(ii) The video tolls in question were assessed within a 30–day period;
or
(iii) Mitigating factors exist with respect to the assessment of the
unpaid video tolls and associated civil penalties, as determined by the Authority.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, until the Authority refers
the debt to the Central Collection Unit or after the Authority has recalled a delinquent
account from the Central Collection Unit, the Authority:
(i) May waive any portion of the video toll due or civil penalty
assessed under this section; and
(ii) Shall:
– 7 –

Ch. 482 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. Waive the civil penalty associated with a video toll on
payment of the video toll in accordance with the Authority’s Customer Assistance Plan as
approved on February 24, 2022; and
2. Reimburse any civil penalty paid in error under the Plan.
(i) (1) The Administration shall refuse or suspend the registration of a motor
vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER) VEHICLE that incurs a toll violation under this section if:
(i) The [Maryland Transportation] Authority notifies the
Administration that a registered owner of the motor vehicle OR CLASS G (TRAILER)
VEHICLE has been served with a citation in accordance with this section and has failed to:
1. Pay the video toll and the civil penalty for the toll violation
by the date specified in the citation; [and] OR
2. Contest liability for the toll violation by the date identified
and in the manner specified in the citation; or
(ii) The [Maryland Transportation] Authority or the District Court
notifies the Administration that a person who elected to contest liability for a toll violation
under this section [has failed to]:
1. [Appear] HAS FAILED TO APPEAR for trial or has been
determined to be guilty of the toll violation; and
2. [Pay] HAS FAILED TO PAY the video toll and civil penalty.
(2) In conjunction with the [Maryland Transportation] Authority, the
Administration may adopt regulations and develop procedures to carry out the refusal or
suspension of a registration under this subsection.
(3) The procedures in this subsection are in addition to any other penalty
provided by law for a toll violation under this section.
(4) This subsection may be applied to enforce a reciprocal agreement
entered into by the State and another jurisdiction in accordance with § 21–1415 of this
subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 8 –